Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.241

Mortgage loan originator application—Required submission and use of personal information.

(1) As part of or in connection with an application for any license under this section, or periodically upon license renewal, the mortgage loan originator applicant shall furnish information concerning his or her identity, including fingerprints for submission to the Washington state patrol, the federal bureau of investigation, the nationwide mortgage licensing system *and registry, or any governmental agency or entity authorized to receive this information for a state and national criminal history background check; personal history; experience; business record; purposes; and other pertinent facts, as the director may reasonably require. As part of or in connection with an application for a license under this chapter, or periodically upon license renewal, the director is authorized to receive criminal history record information that includes nonconviction data as defined in RCW 10.97.030. The department may only disseminate nonconviction data obtained under this section to criminal justice agencies. This section does not apply to financial institutions regulated under chapters 31.12 and 31.13 RCW and Titles **30, 32, and 33 RCW.

(2) As part of or in connection with an application for any license under this section, the mortgage loan originator applicant shall furnish information pertaining to personal history and experience in a form prescribed by the nationwide mortgage licensing system *and registry, including (a) the submission of authorization for the nationwide mortgage licensing system *and registry and the director to obtain an independent credit report obtained from a consumer reporting agency described in section 603(p) of the federal fair credit reporting act, and (b) information related to any administrative, civil, or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction.

(3) In order to reduce the points of contact which the federal bureau of investigation may have to maintain, the director may use the nationwide mortgage licensing system *and registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from and distributing information to the department of justice or any governmental agency.

(4) In order to reduce the points of contact which the director may have to maintain, the director may use the nationwide mortgage licensing system *and registry as a channeling agent for requesting and distributing information to and from any source so directed by the director.

[ 2009 c 120 s 16.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The term "and registry" was removed by 2013 c 29 s 1.

**(2) Title 30 RCW was recodified and/or repealed pursuant to 2014 c 37, effective January 5, 2015.

Findings—Declaration—2009 c 120: See note following RCW 31.04.015.